Hawaii statutes.
§431K-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner of this State.

"Completed operations liability"
means liability arising out of the installation, maintenance, or repair of any
product at a site which is not owned or controlled by any person who:

(1) Performs that work; or

(2) Hires an independent contractor to perform that
work; but shall include liability for activities which are completed or
abandoned before the date of the occurrence giving rise to the liability.

"Domicile", for purposes of
determining the state in which a purchasing group is domiciled, means:

(1) For a corporation, the state in which the
purchasing group is incorporated; or

(2) For an unincorporated entity, the state of its
principal place of business.

"Financially impaired" means that a
risk retention group:

(1) Has admitted assets that are less than the sum of
its aggregate liabilities and the amount of surplus to policyholders required
to be maintained by a risk retention group chartered in this State and
authorized to do the same kind or kinds of insurance; or

(2) Has admitted assets that are less than the sum of
its aggregate liabilities and outstanding capital stock; or

(3) Is insolvent.

"Hazardous financial condition" means
that, based on its present or reasonably anticipated financial condition, a
risk retention group, although not yet financially impaired or insolvent, is
unlikely to be able to:

(1) Meet obligations to policyholders with respect to
known claims and reasonably anticipated claims; or

(2) Pay other obligations in the normal course of
business.

"Insolvent" means that a risk
retention group has admitted assets that are less than the aggregate amount of
its liabilities.

"Insurance" means primary insurance,
excess insurance, reinsurance, surplus lines insurance, and any other
arrangement for shifting and distributing risk which is determined to be
insurance under the laws of this State.

"Liability" means legal liability for
damages, including costs of defense, legal costs and fees, and other claims
expenses because of injuries to other persons, damage to their property, or
other damage or loss to those other persons resulting from or arising out of:

(1) Any business, whether for profit or nonprofit,
trade, product, services, including professional services, premises, or
operations; or

(2) Any activity of any state or county government,
or any agency or political subdivision;

but does not include personal risk liability and an
employer's liability with respect to its employees other than legal liability
under the Federal Employers' Liability Act, 45 U.S.C. §51 et seq.

"Personal risk liability" means
liability for damages because of injury to any person, damage to property, or
other loss or damage resulting from any personal, familial, or household
responsibilities or activities, rather than from responsibilities or activities
referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) in the definition of
"liability".

"Plan of operation" or
"feasibility study" means an analysis which presents the expected
activities and results of a risk retention group including, not less than the
following:

(1) The coverages, deductibles, coverage limits,
rates, and rating classification systems for each line of insurance the group
intends to offer;

(2) Historical and expected loss experience of the
proposed members and national experience of similar exposures to the extent
that this experience is reasonably available;

(3) Pro forma financial statements and projections;

(4) Appropriate opinions by a qualified, independent
casualty actuary, including a determination of minimum premiums or
participation levels required to commence operations and to prevent a hazardous
financial condition;

(5) Identification of management, underwriting
procedures, managerial oversight methods, investment policies;

(6) Identification of each state in which the risk
retention group has obtained, or sought to obtain, a charter and license, and a
description of its status in each state; and

(7) Other matters as may be prescribed by the
commissioner for liability insurance companies authorized by the insurance laws
of the state in which the risk retention group is chartered.

"Product liability" means liability
for damages because of any personal injury, death, emotional harm,
consequential economic damage, or property damage, including damages resulting
from the loss of use of property, arising out of the manufacture, design,
importation, distribution, packaging, labeling, lease, or sale of a product,
but does not include the liability of any person for those damages if the
product involved was in the possession of the person when the incident giving
rise to the claim occurred.

"Purchasing group" means any group
which:

(1) Has as one of its purposes the purchase of liability
insurance on a group basis;

(2) Purchases this insurance only for its group
members and only to cover their similar or related liability exposure, as
described in [paragraph (3)];

(3) Is composed of members whose businesses or
activities are similar or related with respect to the liability to which
members are exposed by virtue of any related, similar, or common business,
trade, product, services, premises, or operations; and

(4) Is domiciled in any state.

"Risk retention group" means any
corporation or other limited liability association formed under the laws of any
state, Bermuda, or the Cayman Islands:

(1) Whose primary activity consists of assuming and
spreading all, or any portion, of the liability exposure of its group members;

(2) Which is organized for the primary purpose of
conducting the activity described under paragraph (1);

(3) Which:

(A) Is chartered and licensed as a liability
insurance company and authorized to engage in the business of insurance under
the laws of any state; or

(B) Before January 1, 1985, was chartered or
licensed and authorized to engage in the business of insurance under the laws
of Bermuda or the Cayman Islands and, before this date, had certified to the
insurance commissioner of at least one state that it satisfied the
capitalization requirements of that state, except that any group shall be
considered to be a risk retention group only if the group has been engaged in
business continuously since this date and only for the purpose of continuing to
provide insurance to cover product liability or completed operations liability,
as defined in the Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981, 15 U.S.C. §3901
et seq., before the date of the enactment of the Liability Risk Retention Act
of 1986, P.L. 99-563;

(4) Which does not exclude any person from membership
in the group solely to provide for members of the group a competitive advantage
over the person;

(5) Which has as its:

(A) Members only persons who have an ownership
interest in the group and that has as its owners only persons who are members
who are provided insurance by the risk retention group; or

(B) Sole member and sole owner an organization
that is owned by persons who are provided insurance by the risk retention
group;

(6) Whose members are engaged in business or
activities similar or related to the liability of which these members are
exposed by virtue of any related, similar, or common business trade, product,
services, premises, or operations;

(7) Whose activities do not include the provision of
insurance other than:

(A) Liability insurance for assuming and
spreading all or any portion of the liability for its group members; and

(B) Reinsurance with respect to the liability
of any other risk retention group, or any members of another group, which is
engaged in businesses or activities so that this group or member meets the
requirement described in paragraph (6) for membership in the risk retention
group that provides this reinsurance; and

(8) The name of which includes the phrase "risk
retention group".

"State" means any state of the United
States or the District of Columbia. [L 1987, c 180, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 272,
§§2, 3; am L 1997, c 368, §8; am L 2004, c 122, §80]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next